src/morphology/stems/altstem-adjectives.lexc
LEXICON A_ÖYKKÄRI
!! Similarly for front vowels:
!! kehveli
!! kehvelejä
!! kehveleiden
0       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0       A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:e     A_FRONT_PLURALS   ;
0       A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0       A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:e     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ    ;
0:e     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:e     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:e     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN   ;
0       A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:e     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! The i stems have i : e : 0 variation:
!! stadion
!! stadioneja
!! stadioneiden
!0       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!i       A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!i:e     A_BACK_PLURALS   ;
!i       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
!i       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
!i:e     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
!i:e     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!i:e     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
!i:e     A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
!i:0     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!i:e     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! Similarly for front vowels:
!! besserwisser
!! besserwisserejä
!! besserwissereiden
!0       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!0:i       A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!0:e     A_FRONT_PLURALS   ;
!0:i       A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
!0:i       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
!0:e     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ    ;
!0:e     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
!0:e     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!0:e     A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN   ;
!0     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!0:e     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! The short i stems have another i : e : 0 variation
!! ovi
!! ovena
!! ovessa
!! ovissa
!! ovista
!i       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!i:e       A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!i:0     A_BACK_PLURALS   ;
!i:e       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
!i:e      A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!i:0     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!i:0     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!i:0     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! The short i stems have another i : e : 0 variation
!! helmi
!! helmenä
!! helmessä
!! helmissä
!! helmistä
!i       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!i:e       A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!i:0     A_FRONT_PLURALS   ;
!i:e       A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
!i:e      A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!i:0     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
!i:0     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!i:0     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! happi
!! hapessa
!! happina
!! hapista
!! happien
!pi       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!pi:pe    A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!pi:e     A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!pi:p     A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!pi:0     A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!pi:pe    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
!pi:pe    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!pi:p     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!pi:p     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!pi:p     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! typpi
!! typessä
!! typpinä
!! typistä
!! typpien
!pi       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!pi:pe    A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!pi:e     A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!pi:p     A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!pi:0     A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!pi:pe    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
!pi:pe    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!pi:p     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
!pi:p     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!pi:p     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! noki
!! noessa
!! nokina
!! noista
!! nokien
!ki       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ki:ke    A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!ki:e     A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!ki:k     A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!ki:0     A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!ki:ke    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
!ki:ke    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!ki:k     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!ki:k     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!ki:k     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! käki
!! käessä
!! käkinä
!! käistä
!! käkien
!ki       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ki:ke    A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!ki:e     A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!ki:k     A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!ki:0     A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!ki:ke    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
!ki:ke    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!ki:k     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
!ki:k     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!ki:k     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! korpi
!! korvessa
!! korpina
!! korvista
!! korpien
!pi       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!pi:pe    A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!pi:ve    A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!pi:p     A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!pi:v     A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!pi:pe    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
!pi:pe    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!pi:p     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!pi:p     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!pi:p     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! kilpi
!! kilvessä
!! kilpinä
!! kilvistä
!! kilpien
!pi       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!pi:pe    A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!pi:ve    A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!pi:p     A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!pi:v     A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!pi:pe    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
!pi:pe    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!pi:p     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
!pi:p     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!pi:p     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! lahti
!! lahdessa
!! lahtina
!! lahdista
!! lahtien
!ti       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ti:te    A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!ti:de    A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!ti:t     A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!ti:d     A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!ti:te    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
!ti:te    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!ti:t     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!ti:t     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!ti:t     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! lehti
!! lehdessä
!! lehtinä
!! lehdistä
!! lehtien
!ti       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ti:te    A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!ti:de    A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!ti:t     A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!ti:d     A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!ti:te    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
!ti:te    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!ti:t     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
!ti:t     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!ti:t     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! onki
!! ongessa
!! onkina
!! ongista
!! onkien
!ki       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ki:ke    A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!ki:ge    A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!ki:k     A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!ki:g     A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!ki:ke    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
!ki:ke    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!ki:k     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!ki:k     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!ki:k     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! henki
!! hengessä
!! henkinä
!! hengistä
!! henkien
!ki       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ki:ke    A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!ki:ge    A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!ki:k     A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!ki:g     A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!ki:ke    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
!ki:ke    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!ki:k     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
!ki:k     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!ki:k     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! lampi
!! lammessa
!! lampina
!! lammista
!! lampien
!pi       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!pi:pe    A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!pi:me    A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!pi:p     A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!pi:m     A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!pi:pe    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
!pi:pe    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!pi:p     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!pi:p     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!pi:p     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! rimpi
!! rimmessä
!! rimpinä
!! rimmistä
!! rimpien
!pi       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!pi:pe    A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!pi:me    A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!pi:p     A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!pi:m     A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!pi:pe    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
!pi:pe    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!pi:p     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
!pi:p     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!pi:p     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
!
!!LEXICON A_
!! No Examples
!!ki       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!!ki:ke    A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!!ki:je    A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!!ki:k     A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!!ki:j     A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!!ki:ke    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
!!ki:ke    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!!ki:k     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!!ki:k     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!!ki:k     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! järki
!! järjessä
!! järkinä
!! järjistä
!! järkien
!ki       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ki:ke    A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!ki:je    A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!ki:k     A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!ki:j     A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!ki:ke    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
!ki:ke    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!ki:k     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
!ki:k     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!ki:k     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;


LEXICON A_AAVA
!! kirja
!! kirjaa
!! kirjana
!! kirjassa
!! kirjoina
!! kirjojen
!! kirjoihin
0:a A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:o   A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN      ;
0:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:o   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:o   A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:a A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
0:o   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:o    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;
!
!!LEXICON A_
!!a   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
!!a   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!!o   A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
!!a   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN      ;
!!a   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
!!o   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
!!o   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
!!a   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
!!o   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;

LEXICON A_TARKKA
!! politiikka
!! politiikkaa
!! politiikkana
!! politiikassa
!! politiikkoina
!! politiikkojen
!! politiikkoihin
0:a A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:a   A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:ko A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:a A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:o   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:o   A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:a A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
0:o   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:o    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;
!
!
!LEXICON A_
!! tippa
!! tippaa
!! tippana
!! tipassa
!! tippoina
!! tippojen
!! tippoihin
!pa  A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!pa  A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!pa:a   A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
!pa:po A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
!pa:o    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
!pa   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
!pa   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
!pa:po  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
!pa:po  A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
!pa   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
!pa:po  A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
LEXICON A_MATTA
!! mitta
!! mittaa
!! mittana
!! mitassa
!! mittoina
!! mittojen
!! mittoihin
0:a A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:a   A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:to A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:a A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:to  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:to  A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:a A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:to  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:o    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;


LEXICON A_HALPA
!! salpa
!! salpaa
!! salpana
!! salvassa
!! salpoina
!! salpojen
!! salpoihin
0:a A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:va  A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:po A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:vo   A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:a A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:po  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:po  A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:a A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:po  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ve    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:vo    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_EHTA
!! pata
!! pataa
!! patana
!! padassa
!! patoina
!! patojen
!! patoihin
0:a A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:da  A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:to A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:do   A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:a A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:to  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:to  A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:a A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:to  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:da    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:do    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

!LEXICON A_
!! lanka
!! lankaa
!! lankana
!! langassa
!! lankoina
!! lankojen
!! lankoihin
!0:a A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!0:a A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!0:ga  A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
!0:ko A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
!0:go   A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
!0:a A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
!0:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
!0:ko  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
!0:ko  A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
!0:a A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
!0:ko  A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!0:ge    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
!0:go    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;
